Washington statutes.
RCW 39.84.170

Implementation of economic development programs by port district—Use of nonprofit corporations—Transfer of funds.

Funds received by a port district under RCW 39.84.130 may be transferred to a nonprofit corporation created or re-created for the exclusive purpose of providing training, education, and general improvement to the public sector management skills necessary to implement the economic development programs of the port district. The nonprofit corporation selected for that purpose may be, without limitation, a corporation formed by the Washington public ports association.

Any nonprofit corporation selected for the purposes of this section must have tax exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).

Transfers and expenditures of funds shall be deemed to be for industrial development and trade promotion as provided in Article VIII, section 8 of the Washington state Constitution.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the receipt of additional public or private funds by a nonprofit corporation for the purposes described in this section.

[ 2000 c 198 s 2.]